Idaho, session 2026, S1255.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 66-326, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
66-326. DETENTION WITHOUT HEARING. (1) No person shall be taken into
custody or detained as an alleged emergency patient for observation, diag-
nosis, evaluation, care or treatment of mental illness unless and until the
court has ordered such apprehension and custody under the provisions out-
lined in section 66-329, Idaho Code; provided, however, that a person may be
taken into custody by a peace officer and placed in a facility, or the per-
son may be detained at a hospital or tribal health facility at which the per-
son presented or was brought to receive medical or mental health care, if the
peace officer or a physician medical staff member of such hospital or tribal
health facility or a physician's assistant or advanced practice registered
nurse practicing in such hospital or tribal health facility has reason to be-
lieve that the person is gravely disabled due to mental illness or the per-
son's continued liberty poses an imminent danger to that person or others,
as evidenced by a threat of substantial physical harm; provided, under no
circumstances shall the proposed patient be detained in a nonmedical unit
used for the detention of individuals charged with or convicted of penal of-
fenses. For purposes of this section, the term "peace officer" shall in-
clude tribal police officers and state probation and parole officers exer-
cising their authority to supervise probationers and parolees. Whenever a
person is taken into custody or detained under this section without court or-
der, the evidence supporting the claim of grave disability due to mental ill-
ness or imminent danger must be presented to a duly authorized court within
twenty-four (24) hours from the time the individual was placed in custody or
detained.
(2) If the court finds the individual to be gravely disabled due to men-
tal illness or imminently dangerous under subsection (1) of this section,
the court shall issue a temporary custody order requiring the person to be
held in a facility, and requiring an examination of the person by a desig-
nated examiner within twenty-four (24) hours of the entry of the order of the
court. Under no circumstances shall the proposed patient be detained in a
nonmedical unit used for the detention of individuals charged with or con-
victed of penal offenses.
(3) Where an examination is required under subsection (2) of this sec-
tion, the designated examiner shall make his findings and report to the court
within twenty-four (24) hours of the examination.


(4) If the designated examiner finds, in his examination under this
section, that the person is mentally ill, and either is likely to injure him-
self or others or is gravely disabled due to mental illness, the prosecuting
attorney shall file, within twenty-four (24) hours of the examination of the
person, a petition with the court requesting the patient's detention pend-
ing commitment proceedings pursuant to the provisions of section 66-329,
Idaho Code. Upon the receipt of such a petition, the court shall order his
detention to await hearing which shall be within five (5) days (including
Saturdays, Sundays and legal holidays) of the detention order. If no pe-
tition is filed within twenty-four (24) hours of the designated examiner's
examination of the person, the person shall be released from the facility.
(5) Any person held in custody under the provisions of this section
shall have the same protection and rights that are guaranteed to a person
already committed to the department director. Upon taking a person into
custody, a good faith effort shall be made to provide notice to the person's
legal guardian, parent, spouse, or adult next-of-kin of the person's physi-
cal whereabouts and the reasons for taking the person into custody.
(6) Nothing in this section shall preclude a hospital or tribal health
facility from transferring a person who has been detained under this section
to another facility that is willing to accept the transferred individual for
purposes of observation, diagnosis, evaluation, care or treatment.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.